Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF323.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2074YH (3) 91 sb/js H.F. 323 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 462A.27B Dock structures ââ 1 insurance. 2 1. A person with a valid dock site permit and hoist or slip 3 assignment may construct an enclosed structure to protect a 4 hoist or slip if all of the following apply: 5 a. The enclosed structure is constructed with rust-resistant 6 materials. 7 b. The enclosed structure is no more than thirty feet wide. 8 c. The enclosed structure is no more than twenty feet above 9 the normal water elevation surrounding the dock. 10 d. The enclosed structure contains no plumbing, electricity, 11 or enclosed storage areas, except for plumbing and electricity 12 that complies with all applicable building code requirements, 13 including the state plumbing code established pursuant to 14 section 105.4 and the state building code established pursuant 15 to section 103A.7, and is used for the sole purpose of 16 supporting marine equipment. 17 e. The enclosed structure is not used for sleeping purposes 18 or habitation by a person. 19 2. To install an enclosed structure on a private dock 20 pursuant to subsection 1, a person must maintain dock liability 21 insurance with minimum per occurrence coverage of at least one 22 million dollars. The owner of the private dock shall be liable 23 for any damages caused by the enclosed structure constructed on 24 the private dock. 25